Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3010
Schools of podiatry; approval; requirements.

No school of podiatry shall be approved by the board unless the school is accredited by the Council on Podiatric Medical Education of the American Podiatric Medical Association.

Laws 1927, c. 167, § 75, p. 474;

C.S.1929, § 71-1004;

R.S.1943, § 71-176;

Laws 1947, c. 228, § 2, p. 724;

Laws 1961, c. 337, § 11, p. 1056;

Laws 1967, c. 438, § 6, p. 1352;

Laws 1973, LB 52, § 1;

Laws 1995, LB 173, § 3;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-176;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1032.